Utah statutes.
31A-22-406.   Table of installments.

Any life insurance policy which provides that the proceeds may be payable in installments, which are determinable at the issue of the policy, shall provide in the policy a table showing the amounts and intervals of the guaranteed installments.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

